Hawaii statutes.
§329-122 Medical use of marijuana;
conditions of use. (a) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the
medical use of marijuana by a qualifying patient shall be permitted only if:

(1) The qualifying patient has been diagnosed by a
physician or advanced practice registered nurse as having a debilitating
medical condition;

(2) The qualifying patient's physician or advanced
practice registered nurse has certified in writing that, in the physician's or
advanced practice registered nurse's professional opinion, the potential
benefits of the medical use of marijuana would likely outweigh the health risks
for the particular qualifying patient; and

(3) The amount of marijuana possessed by the
qualifying patient does not exceed an adequate supply.

(b) Subsection (a) shall not apply to a
qualifying patient under the age of eighteen years, unless:

(1) The qualifying patient's physician or advanced
practice registered nurse has explained the potential risks and benefits of the
medical use of marijuana to the qualifying patient and to a parent, guardian,
or person having legal custody of the qualifying patient; and

(2) A parent, guardian, or person having legal
custody consents in writing to:

(A) Allow the qualifying patient's medical
use of marijuana;

(B) Serve as the qualifying patient's primary
caregiver; and

(C) Control the acquisition of the marijuana,
the dosage, and the frequency of the medical use of marijuana by the qualifying
patient.

(c) The authorization for the medical use of
marijuana in this section shall not apply to:

(1) The medical use of marijuana that endangers the
health or well-being of another person;

(2) The medical use of marijuana:

(A) In a school bus, public bus, or any
moving vehicle;

(B) In the workplace of one's employment;

(C) On any school grounds;

(D) At any public park, public beach, public
recreation center, recreation or youth center; or

(E) At any other place open to the public;
provided that a qualifying patient, primary caregiver, or an owner or employee
of a medical marijuana dispensary licensed under chapter 329D shall not be
prohibited from transporting marijuana or any manufactured marijuana product,
as that term is defined in section 329D-1, in any public place; provided
further that the marijuana or manufactured marijuana product shall be
transported in a sealed container, not be visible to the public, and shall not
be removed from its sealed container or consumed or used in any way while it is
in the public place; and

(3) The use of marijuana by a qualifying patient,
parent, or primary caregiver for purposes other than medical use permitted by
this part.

(d) For the purposes of this section,
"transport" means the transportation of marijuana, usable marijuana,
or any manufactured marijuana product between:

(1) A qualifying patient and the qualifying patient's
primary caregiver;

(2) The production centers and the retail dispensing locations
under a dispensary licensee's license; or

(3) A production center or retail dispensing location
and a certified laboratory for the purpose of laboratory testing;

provided that "transport" does not include
the interisland transportation of marijuana, usable marijuana, or any
manufactured marijuana product, except when the transportation is performed for
the sole purpose of laboratory testing pursuant to section 329D-8, as permitted
under section 329D-6(m) and subject to section 329D‑6(j), and with the
understanding that state law and its protections do not apply outside of the
jurisdictional limits of the State. [L 2000, c 228, pt of §2; am L 2001, c 55,
§15; am L 2013, c 178, §3; am L 2015, c 241, §7; am L 2016, c 230, §8]

Law Journals and Reviews

Gonzales v. Raich: How the Medical Marijuana Debate Invoked
Commerce Clause Confusion. 28 UH L. Rev. 261.

Case Notes

Rule of lenity required the construction, under the specific
facts of the case, of §§329-121 and 329-125 and this section against the
government, as there was an irreconcilable inconsistency between the authorized
transportation of medical marijuana under §329-121, and the prohibition on
transport of medical marijuana through "any ... place open to the
public" under subsection [(c)(2)(E)]; thus, under §701-115(2)(b),
petitioner was entitled to an acquittal because petitioner's evidence, when
considered in light of any contrary prosecution evidence proved by a
preponderance of the evidence the specified fact or facts with negatived penal
liability. 129 H. 397, 301 P.3d 607 (2013).

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next